Wyoming, session 2025, SF0127.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 28-9-109 is created to read:
28-9-109. Agency rules; analysis and review.
(a) The legislative service office shall review each
major rule submitted under this act and report the review
in accordance with this section.
(b) For each major rule submitted under this act, the
legislative service office shall:
(i) Not later than fifteen (15) days after the
major rule was submitted under W.S. 28-9-103(b), provide
the major rule to each member of the legislature;
(ii) Not later than the time specified in
subsection (e) of this section, complete a regulatory
impact analysis in accordance with subsection (c) of this
section.
(c) Each regulatory impact analysis of a major rule
shall include:
(i) A statement of need for the major rule,
provided by the agency promulgating the major rule;
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0127
ENROLLED ACT NO. 59, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(ii) The statutory authority for the
promulgation of the major rule;
(iii) An examination of alternatives to the
enactment of the major rule;
(iv) An evaluation of the costs and benefits for
the major rule, including:
(A) Estimated primary or direct benefits
accruing as a result of the major rule;
(B) Estimated cost savings or financial
benefits to the state and its residents and businesses;
(C) Estimated compliance costs for
regulated entities subject to the major rule;
(D) Estimated secondary or indirect costs
associated with the major rule;
(E) Estimated effect on state revenue;
(F) Estimated effect on state expenditures,
including estimated administrative expenses;
(G) Estimated opportunity costs. For
purposes of this subparagraph, the cost of compliance in
terms of any resulting removal of private capital from the
market shall be included in the analysis;
(H) The sources consulted to complete the
analysis;
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0127
ENROLLED ACT NO. 59, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(J) Key assumptions made and sources of
uncertainty with the analysis;
(K) Any other information the legislative
service office determines would be beneficial for
legislative consideration of the major rule.
(d) Upon completing a regulatory impact analysis, the
legislative service office shall provide the analysis to
each member of the legislature and shall make the analysis
available to the public.
(e) The legislative service office shall complete
each regulatory analysis not later than fifty (50) days
after the major rule was submitted for review under W.S.
28-9-103(b).
(f) To the extent resources are available, the
council may direct the legislative service office to
perform a regulatory impact analysis for any existing major
rule.
(g) The legislative service office may request any
information, expertise or assistance from an agency
promulgating a major rule. Upon receiving a request under
this subsection, the agency shall provide all information
and assistance necessary for the legislative service office
to complete the regulatory impact analysis required under
this section.
(h) "Major rule" means a rule, including an emergency
rule, designated by management council under W.S. 28-9-109
that will result in or is likely to result in one (1) or
more of the following:
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0127
ENROLLED ACT NO. 59, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(i) An annual impact on the economy of Wyoming
that will result in direct or indirect costs of not less
than one million dollars ($1,000,000.00);
(ii) Significant adverse effects on competition,
employment, investment, productivity or innovation in the
state, including significant adverse effects on individual
industries or regions within Wyoming.
Section 2. W.S. 28-9-101(a)(iv), 28-9-103(d) and by
creating a new subsection (e), 28-9-104(a)(intro) and
28-9-107 by creating a new subsection (d) are amended to
read:
28-9-101. Definitions.
(a) As used in this act:
(iv) "This act" means W.S. 28-9-101 through
28-9-108 28-9-109.
28-9-103. Submission of rules for review; notice to
legislators.
(d) Upon receipt of an agency's notice to adopt new
rules pursuant to W.S. 16-3-103(a)(i), the legislative
service office shall give notice to the primary sponsor of
the legislation, to members of the interim or standing
committee which sponsored or acted upon the legislation
authorizing the new rules and to any every other
legislator. requesting notification. The notice given by
the legislative service office shall state a copy of the
rules will be sent if requested. Notice under this
subsection is not required for persons not currently
serving in the legislature.
4

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0127
ENROLLED ACT NO. 59, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(e) Upon receipt of an agency's notice to adopt rules
under W.S. 16-3-103(a)(i), the legislative service office
shall give notice to each legislator.
28-9-104. Review procedure; time for review; criteria
for review.
(a) The legislative service office shall review rules
submitted under W.S. 28-9-103(b) and report its findings to
the council. The legislative service office shall review
new rules and include therein any comments from the primary
sponsor of the legislation, the chairman of the interim or
standing committee which sponsored or acted upon the
legislation authorizing the new rules and any other
legislator submitting comments, and shall report their
findings to the council. The legislative service office
shall review all major rules in accordance with W.S.
28-9-109. The report required under this subsection shall
be submitted to the council:
28-9-107. Legislative orders; action required;
implementation and enforcement of rules.
(d) If the council, management audit committee, a
joint interim committee or any legislator determines that
it is appropriate after reviewing the results of the
analysis completed under W.S. 28-9-109, the council, a
joint interim committee or any legislator may introduce
legislation in the next succeeding legislative session
following the completion of the analysis to obtain a
legislative order to prohibit the implementation or
enforcement of the major rule.
5

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0127
ENROLLED ACT NO. 59, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 3. This act shall apply to all rules for
which notice is given under W.S. 16-3-103(a)(i) on and
after July 1, 2026.
Section 4. During the 2025 interim, the management
audit committee of the Wyoming legislature shall study this
act and its relation to existing statutory provisions
concerning the legislative role in the administrative rule
review process. The management audit committee shall
receive all assistance requested from the legislative
service office and executive branch agencies while
conducting the study required by this section. Not later
than December 1, 2025, the management audit committee shall
report to the management council on the conclusion of the
study required by this section. The report shall include,
but not necessarily be limited to, the appropriate
legislative role in overseeing administrative rules and the
regulatory impact thereof, the legislative staff required
to assist the legislature in completing this role, which
legislative body should oversee this role when the
legislature is not in session and any statutory changes
necessary to effectuate the findings in the report. The
management audit committee or management council may
sponsor legislation during the 2026 budget session to
effectuate the findings of the report. Funding for
legislative staff necessary to effectuate the findings of
the report required by this section may be included in the
2025 legislative appropriations bill.
Section 5.
(a) There is appropriated four hundred thousand
dollars ($400,000.00) from the general fund to the
legislative service office for the purposes of hiring not
more than two (2) full time equivalent employees to perform
6

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0127
ENROLLED ACT NO. 59, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
the functions specified in this act. Notwithstanding W.S.
9-2-1008, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207, this appropriation shall
remain in effect and shall not lapse or revert at the end
of the fiscal biennium except upon further legislative
action.
(b) The legislative service office may take any
action necessary to implement this act before July 1, 2026,
including the hiring of positions to implement this act.
7

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0127
ENROLLED ACT NO. 59, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 6.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.
(b) Sections 3 through 6 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
8